Utah statutes.
76-5b-301.   Determination whether material violates chapter.

(1)  In determining whether material is in violation of this chapter, the material need not be considered as a whole, but may be examined by the trier of fact in part only.

(2)  It is not an element of the offense of sexual exploitation of a minor that the material appeal to the prurient interest in sex of the average person nor that prohibited conduct need be portrayed in a patently offensive manner.

(3)  It is not an element of the offense of sexual exploitation of a vulnerable adult that the material appeal to the prurient interest in sex of the average person nor that prohibited conduct need be portrayed in a patently offensive manner.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 320, 2011 General Session

